Louisiana, session 2026, HB1063.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Higher Education
Accountability and Governance Act".
Section 2.(A) The legislature finds that the state of Louisiana makes a substantial
investment in public postsecondary education and that with this ongoing public investment
comes a duty for public postsecondary education institutions to serve the interests of the
people of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1063
(B) The legislature finds that the legislature has a critical interest in setting priorities
for public postsecondary education institutions, which are ultimately answerable to the
people of Louisiana and their duly elected representatives, in order to ensure the wise use
of the state's money.
(C) The legislature acknowledges the importance of academic freedom and
intellectual diversity as values that aid the pursuit of truth in postsecondary education.
(D) This Act is enacted pursuant to the legislature's authority under the Preamble of
Article VIII of the Constitution of Louisiana and shall not be construed to infringe upon the
constitutional powers granted to the Board of Regents or the public postsecondary education
management boards.
Section 3. Part XV of Chapter 26 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:3399.51 through 3399.56, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XV. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION: CORE CURRICULUM, HIRING AND
EMPLOYMENT, FACULTY DELIBERATIVE BODIES, AND NONACADEMIC
DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDINGS
§3399.51. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part:
(1) "Core curriculum" means the collection of courses that students are
required to complete for credit toward completion of a degree program.
(2) "Degree program" means a program leading to a degree, certificate, or
other credential.
(3) "Faculty deliberative body" means any senate, committee, council, union,
or other organization of the faculty recognized by an institution as having a formal
role in the governance of the institution, with responsibilities extending beyond a
single school or department.
(4) "Public postsecondary education institution" or "institution" means an
institution under the supervision and management of the Board of Supervisors of
Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the Board of
Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1063
Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System, or the Board of
Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges.
(5) "Public postsecondary education management board" means the Board
of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical
College, the Board of Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College, the Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana
System, and the Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges.
§3399.52. Core curriculum
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each management board, in
consultation with the Board of Regents, shall annually review all courses forming the
core curriculum for each degree program at each institution under its supervision and
management and determine if each course meets the following criteria:
(1) The course is foundational and fundamental to a sound postsecondary
education.
(2) The course is necessary to prepare for civic or professional life.
(3) The course reflects core content and methodologies of historic liberal arts
and preprofessional disciplines.
B. Each management board shall make a report outlining the courses subject
to review, course descriptions, the criteria for reviewing them, and the process for
review available publicly online for at least thirty days prior to the meeting of the
management board at which the review will be discussed.
C. Each management board shall vote to certify that the courses offered by
each institution under its supervision and management as part of the core curriculum
for each degree program meet the criteria in Subsection A of this Section.
D. Each year, each management board shall vote on whether to reauthorize
or revise the core curriculum for each degree program at each institution under its
supervision and management.
E. Each management board shall comply with the provisions of this Section
by the end of the 2027-2028 academic year. For subsequent academic years, the
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1063
annual review shall include a review of the previous year's approved courses and, for
each course, its satisfaction of the criteria in Subsection A of this Section.
§3399.53. Faculty and administrator hiring and employment
A. Each management board shall approve or deny at a public meeting the
proposed job posting for any position proposed to be filled by an individual who will
be eligible for tenure and will teach at least one course in any field. Each proposed
job posting shall be posted publicly online at least thirty days prior to the
management board's meeting. The board may vote on multiple proposed postings
in a single motion.
B.(1) Each management board shall approve or deny at a public meeting the
hiring, appointment, or promotion of any individual who will serve as a chancellor,
vice chancellor, president, vice president, provost, associate provost, dean, or any
other position of comparable authority at an institution under its supervision and
management.
(2) The curriculum vitae of any individual considered for such a position
shall be posted publicly online at least thirty days prior to the management board's
consideration of his hiring, appointment, or promotion.
C. Any search committee tasked with identifying candidates for president or
provost at an institution shall comply with the following requirements:
(1) At least sixty percent of its members shall be members of the
management board, who shall be the only voting members of the committee.
(2) Be composed of other members as approved by the management board.
(3) If an external search firm is used to support the search committee, the
firm shall be approved by the management board.
D. No management board shall delegate the duties ascribed to it in this
Section to any other individual, official, or entity.
§3399.54. Faculty deliberative bodies
A. The following provisions shall apply to each faculty deliberative body:
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1063
(1) It shall perform a strictly advisory role, making nonbinding
recommendations to administrative officers of the institution.
(2) It shall not present itself as an authoritative or policymaking body.
(3) The president of the institution shall appoint the head of the faculty
deliberative body.
(4) Membership on the faculty deliberative body is limited to full professors
with tenure, and service is limited to one academic year. Upon completion of this
term of service, the faculty member shall not be eligible to serve again for four
academic years.
(5) No state or institution funds shall be used to pay for staff or
administrative employees dedicated exclusively to the faculty deliberative body.
(6) If a faculty deliberative body rejects a course or curriculum proposal in
whole or in part, the president, provost, and relevant officers shall review and
consider the entirety of the proposal.
(7) The names of the members in attendance shall be recorded at any
meeting in which the faculty deliberative body conducts business related to either of
the following:
(a) A vote of no confidence regarding an institution or system administrator.
(b) Policies related to curriculum and academic standards.
B. This Section shall not be construed to limit a faculty member's right to
freedom of association as protected by the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of Louisiana.
C. The provisions of this Section shall supersede and control to the extent
of any conflict with any other provision of law relative to the powers and duties of
faculty deliberative bodies.
§3399.55. Nonacademic disciplinary proceedings
A. Following any major campus disruption arising from legal or policy
violations by students, the chief executive officer of the institution shall submit
anonymized, quarterly, incident-specific disciplinary reports for eighteen months to
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2283 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1063
the management board. Such reports shall include quantitative data on the sanctions
imposed and the names of the admissions officers who reviewed the applications of
sanctioned students.
B. The chief executive officer may convene a special advisory committee to
review the advisory determinations of subordinate administrators or subordinate
bodies in nonacademic disciplinary cases and make recommendations to the chief
executive officer or make the original determination for any nonacademic
disciplinary case.
§3399.56. Compliance
Beginning with the 2027-2028 Fiscal Year, an institution shall not expend
any funds appropriated to it for a given fiscal year until its management board
submits to the legislature and the Board of Regents a report certifying the
management board's compliance with the provisions of this Part during the preceding
fiscal year.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.